Hawaii statutes.
[§134-26] Carrying or possessing a loaded
firearm on a public highway; penalty. (a) It shall be unlawful for any
person on any public highway to carry on the person, or to have in the person's
possession, or to carry in a vehicle any firearm loaded with ammunition;
provided that this section shall not apply to any person who has in the
person's possession or carries a pistol or revolver in accordance with a
license issued as provided in section 134-9.

(b) Any vehicle used in the commission of an
offense under this section shall be forfeited to the State, subject to the
notice and hearing requirements of chapter 712A.

(c) Any person violating this section shall be
guilty of a class B felony. [L 2006, c 66, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Discussed: 911 F. Supp. 2d 972 (2012).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next